test/src/morphology/V-helisemae50_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - helisemä: # Verb (50) helisemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     helisemä+V+Inf/mA: helisemä
     helisemä+V+Inf: helistäq
     helisemä+V+ActPrtPrc: helisnüq
     helisemä+V+PssPrtPrc: helist
     helisemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: helise
     helisemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: helises
     helisemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: helisi
     helisemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: helisi
